zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 辦公室設備 > 計算機: 基礎計算機; 建築計算機; 財務計算機; 繪圖計算機; 科學計算機
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Uredska oprema > Kalkulatori: Obični kalkulatori; Građevinski kalkulatori; Financijski kalkulatori; Grafički kalkulatori; Znanstveni kalkulatori
en: Office Supplies > Office Equipment > Calculators: Basic Calculators; Construction Calculators; Financial Calculators; Graphing Calculators; Scientific Calculators
es: Material de oficina > Equipos para oficina > Calculadoras: Calculadoras básicas; Calculadoras de construcción; Calculadoras financieras; Calculadoras gráficas; Calculadoras científicas
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์สำหรับสำนักงาน > เครื่องคิดเลข: เครื่องคิดเลขทั่วไป; เครื่องคิดเลขสำหรับงานก่อสร้าง; เครื่องคิดเลขสำหรับงานด้านการเงิน; เครื่องคิดเลขกราฟิก; เครื่องคิดเลขวิทยาศาสตร์
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Εξοπλισμός γραφείου > Αριθμομηχανές: Βασικές αριθμομηχανές; Υπολογιστές κατασκευών; Οικονομικοί υπολογιστές; Υπολογιστές γραφημάτων; Επιστημονικοί υπολογιστές
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Thiết bị văn phòng > Máy tính giải toán: Máy tính cơ bản; Máy tính xây dựng; Máy tính tài chính; Máy tính vẽ đồ thị; Máy tính khoa học
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Equipamento para escritório > Calculadoras: Calculadoras básicas; Calculadoras de materiais de construção; Calculadoras financeiras; Calculadoras gráficas; Calculadoras científicas
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Equipamento de escritório > Calculadoras: Calculadoras básicas; Calculadoras para construção; Calculadoras financeiras; Calculadoras gráficas; Calculadoras científicas
hu: Irodai kellékek > Irodai berendezések > Számológépek: Alapvető számológépek; Építőipari számológépek; Pénzügyi számológépek; Grafikonos számológépek; Tudományos számológépek
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Équipement de bureau > Calculatrices: Calculatrices de base; Calculatrices de construction; Calculatrices financières; Calculatrices graphiques; Calculatrices scientifiques
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kancelárske vybavenie > Kalkulačky: Základné kalkulačky; Stavebné kalkulačky; Finančné kalkulačky; Grafické kalkulačky; Vedecké kalkulačky
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Toimistovarusteet > Laskimet: Peruslaskimet; Työmaalaskimet; Talouslaskimet; Graafiset laskimet; Funktiolaskimet
it: Forniture per ufficio > Dotazione per l'ufficio > Calcolatrici: Calcolatrici comuni; Calcolatrici per costruzioni; Calcolatrici finanziarie; Calcolatrici grafiche; Calcolatrici scientifiche
ko: 사무용품 > 사무기기 > 계산기: 기본 계산기; 건축용 계산기; 금융 계산기; 그래핑 계산기; 공학용 계산기
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Kontorsutrustning > Räknemaskiner: Grundläggande miniräknare; Konstruktionsräknare; Finansräknare; Grafritande miniräknare; Funktionsräknare
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pisarniška oprema > Kalkulatorji: Osnovni kalkulatorji; Kalkulatorji za gradbeništvo; Finančni kalkulatorji; Grafični kalkulatorji; Znanstveni kalkulatorji
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Ofis Ekipmanları > Hesap Makineleri: Basit Hesap Makineleri; İnşaat Hesap Makineleri; Finansal Hesap Makineleri; Grafik Hesap Makineleri; Bilimsel Hesap Makineleri
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Офис оборудване > Калкулатори: Стандартни калкулатори; Строителни калкулатори; Финансови калкулатори; Графични калкулатори; Научни калкулатори
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Biuro įranga > Skaičiuotuvai: Paprasti skaičiuotuvai; Statybiniai skaičiuotuvai; Finansiniai skaičiuotuvai; Grafiniai skaičiuotuvai; Moksliniai skaičiuotuvai
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 办公设备 > 计算器: 基础计算器; 建筑计算器; 金融计算器; 绘图计算器; 科学计算器
de: Bürobedarf > Bürogeräte > Taschenrechner: Einfache Taschenrechner; Konstruktionsrechner; Finanzrechner; Grafikrechner; Wissenschaftliche Rechner
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Офисная техника > Калькуляторы: Простые калькуляторы; Строительные калькуляторы; Финансовые калькуляторы; Графические калькуляторы; Инженерные калькуляторы
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sprzęt biurowy > Kalkulatory: Kalkulatory podstawowe; Kalkulatory budowlane; Kalkulatory finansowe; Kalkulatory graficzne; Kalkulatory naukowe
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Kancelářské vybavení > Kalkulačky: Klasické kalkulačky; Kalkulačky pro stavební výpočty; Finanční kalkulačky; Grafické kalkulačky; Vědecké kalkulačky
ja: オフィス用品 > オフィス機器 > 電卓: 計算機 (ベーシック); 計算機 (建設); 計算機 (財務・経理); 計算機 (グラフ); 計算機 (科学)
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Echipamente de birou > Calculatoare: Calculatoare de bază; Calculatoare pentru construcții; Calculatoare financiare; Calculatoare grafice; Calculatoare științifice
da: Kontorforsyning > Kontorudstyr > Regnemaskiner: Almindelige lommeregnere; Lommeregnere til byggeri; Lommeregnere til finans; Lommeregnere til grafer; Lommeregner til videnskab
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Kantoorapparaten > Rekenmachines: Rekenmachine - standaard; Rekenmachine - bouwsector; Rekenmachine - financieel; Rekenmachine - grafisch; Rekenmachine - wetenschappelijk
nb: Kontormateriell > Kontorutstyr > Kalkulatorer: Grunnleggende kalkulatorer; Byggkalkulatorer; Finanskalkulatorer; Grafiske kalkulatorer; Vitenskapelige kalkulatorer